District of Columbia statutes.
1-1001.06

Board independent agency; facilities; seal.

(a)

In the performance of its duties, or in matters of procurement the Board shall not be subject to the direction of any nonjudicial officer of the District, except as provided in the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act of 1978 (§ 1-601.01 et seq.).

(b)

The District government shall furnish to the Board, upon request of the Board, such space and facilities as are available in public buildings in the District to be used as registration or polling places, and such records, information, services, personnel, offices, and equipment, and such other assistance and facilities as may be necessary to enable the Board properly to perform its functions. Privately owned space, facilities and equipment may be rented by the Office of Contracting and Procurement on behalf of the Board for the registration, polling, and other functions of the Board.

(c)

Subject to the approval of the Mayor of the District of Columbia, the Board is authorized to adopt and use a seal.

History

Aug. 12, 1955, 69 Stat. 700, ch. 862, § 6
Oct. 4, 1961, 75 Stat. 817, Pub. L. 87-389, § 1(7)
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(ggg), 25 DCR 5740
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 308, 44 DCR 1423

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1310.
1973 Ed., § 1-1106.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(d) of Omnibus Election Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-236, November 30, 2009, 56 DCR 9154).

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.